Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0431.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 13m. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 333 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 333.7340 CS F Sale, distribution, or delivery of product containing ephedrine or pseudoephedrine by mail, internet, or telephone 4 333.7340c(2) CS D Soliciting another person to purchase or obtain ephedrine or pseudoephedrine to manufacture methamphetamine 10 333.7341(8) CS G Delivery or manufacture of imitation controlled substance 2 333.7401(2)(a)(i) CS A Delivery or manufacture of 1,000 or more grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances Life 333.7401(2)(a)(ii) CS A Delivery or manufacture of 450 or more but less than 1,000 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 30 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 333.7401(2)(a)(iii) CS B Delivery or manufacture of 50 or more but less than 450 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 20 333.7401(2)(a)(iv) CS D Delivery or manufacture of less than 50 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 20 333.7401(2)(b)(i) CS B Delivery or manufacture of methamphetamine or 3, 4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine 20 333.7401(2)(b)(ii) CS E Delivery or manufacture of certain schedule 1, 2, or 3 controlled substances 7 333.7401(2)(c) CS F Delivery or manufacture of schedule 4 controlled substance 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 333.7401(2)(d)(i) CS C Delivery or manufacture of 45 or more kilograms of marihuana or synthetic equivalents of marihuana 15 333.7401(2)(d)(ii) CS D Delivery or manufacture of 5 or more but less than 45 kilograms of marihuana or synthetic equivalents of marihuana 7 333.7401(2)(d)(iii) CS F Delivery or manufacture of less than 5 kilograms or 20 plants of marihuana or synthetic equivalents of marihuana 4 333.7401(2)(e) CS G Delivery or manufacture of schedule 5 controlled substance 2 333.7401(2)(f) CS D Delivery or manufacture of a prescription form or counterfeit prescription form 7 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 333.7401(5)(a) CS A Delivery or manufacture of 1,000 or more grams of heroin, fentanyl, or carfentanil Life 333.7401(5)(b) CS B Delivery or manufacture of 1,000 or more grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 30 333.7401(6)(a) CS A Delivery or manufacture of 450 or more but less than 1,000 grams of heroin, fentanyl, or carfentanil 30 333.7401(6)(b) CS B Delivery or manufacture of 450 or more but less than 1,000 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 20 333.7401(7)(a) CS A Delivery or manufacture of 50 or more but less than 450 grams of heroin, fentanyl, or carfentanil 20 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 333.7401(7)(b) CS C Delivery or manufacture of 50 or more but less than 450 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 20 333.7401(8)(a) CS B Delivery or manufacture of less than 50 grams of heroin, fentanyl, or carfentanil 20 333.7401(8)(b) CS D Delivery or manufacture of less than 50 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 10 333.7401a Person B Delivering a controlled substance or GBL with intent to commit criminal sexual conduct 20 333.7401b(3)(a) CS E Delivery or manufacture of GBL 7 333.7401b(3)(b) CS G Possession of GBL 2 333.7401c(2)(a) CS D Operating or maintaining controlled substance laboratory 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 333.7401c(2)(b) CS B Operating or maintaining controlled substance laboratory in presence of minor 20 333.7401c(2)(c) CS B Operating or maintaining controlled substance laboratory involving hazardous waste 20 333.7401c(2)(d) CS B Operating or maintaining controlled substance laboratory near certain places 20 333.7401c(2)(e) CS A Operating or maintaining controlled substance laboratory involving firearm or other harmful device 25 333.7401c(2)(f) CS B Operating or maintaining controlled substance laboratory involving methamphetamine 20 333.7402(2)(a) CS D Delivery or manufacture of certain counterfeit controlled substances 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 333.7402(2)(b) CS E Delivery or manufacture of schedule 1, 2, or 3 counterfeit controlled substance 5 333.7402(2)(c) CS F Delivery or manufacture of counterfeit schedule 4 controlled substance 4 333.7402(2)(d) CS G Delivery or manufacture of counterfeit schedule 5 controlled substance 2 333.7402(2)(e) CS C Delivery or manufacture of controlled substance analogue 15 333.7403(2)(a)(i) CS A Possession of 1,000 or more grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances Life 333.7403(2)(a)(ii) CS A Possession of 450 or more but less than 1,000 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 30 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 333.7403(2)(a)(iii) CS B Possession of 50 or more but less than 450 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 20 333.7403(2)(a)(iv) CS G Possession of 25 or more but less than 50 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 4 333.7403(2)(a)(v) CS G Possession of less than 25 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 4 333.7403(2)(b)(i) CS D Possession of methamphetamine or 3, 4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine 10 333.7403(2)(b)(ii) CS G Possession of certain schedule 1, 2, 3, or 4 controlled substances or controlled substances analogue 2 333.7403a CS F Fraudulently obtaining controlled substance or prescription for controlled substance 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 333.7405(1)(a) CS G Controlled substance violations by licensee 2 333.7405(1)(b) CS G Manufacturing or distribution violations by licensee 2 333.7405(1)(c) CS G Refusing lawful inspection 2 333.7405(1)(d) CS G Maintaining drug house 2 333.7405(1)(e) CS G Unlawfully dispensing out-of-state prescription 2 333.7407(1)(a) CS G Controlled substance violations by licensee 4 333.7407(1)(b) CS G Use of fictitious, revoked, or suspended license number 4 333.7407(1)(c) CS G Obtaining controlled substance by fraud 4 333.7407(1)(d) CS G False reports under controlled substance article 4 333.7407(1)(e) CS G Possession of counterfeiting implements 4 333.7407(1)(f) CS F Disclosing or obtaining prescription information Possession of a counterfeit prescription form 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 333.7407(1)(g) CS F Possession of counterfeit prescription form 4 333.7407(2) CS G Refusing to furnish records under controlled substance article 4 333.7410a CS G Controlled substance offense or offense involving GBL in or near a park 2 333.7417 CS F Sell or offer to sell named product producing same or similar effect as scheduled ingredient 4 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 430 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.